Illinois, session 104th, SB1258.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prior Authorization Reform Act is amended 5by adding Section 52 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 200/52 new)7    Sec. 52. Prior authorization prohibited. A health 8insurance issuer may not require prior authorization for:9        (1) a prescription drug prescribed to a patient by a 10    health care professional for 6 or more consecutive months, 11    regardless of whether the prescription drug is a 12    non-preferred medication pursuant to the patient's health 13    insurance coverage;14        (2) the following prescription drugs or the 15    therapeutic equivalent approved by the United States Food 16    and Drug Administration: insulin; human immunodeficiency 17    virus prevention medication; human immunodeficiency virus 18    treatment medication; viral hepatitis medication; 19    estrogen; and progesterone; or20        (3) human immunodeficiency virus pre-exposure 21    prophylaxis and post-exposure prophylaxis drugs approved 22    by the United States Food and Drug Administration; 23    Truvada; Harvoni; Descovy; and Apretude.